Oklahoma, session 2026, SB550.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1040.58 of Title 21, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. “Adult cabaret performance” means a performance in a
location, other than an adult cabaret, that features topless
dancers, go-go dancers, exotic dancers, strippers, drag performers,
or similar entertainers, whose performance is harmful to minors,
regardless of whether or not the performance is for consideration;
2. “Drag performer” means a male or female performer who adopts
a flamboyant or parodic feminine or masculine persona with glamorous
or exaggerated costumes and makeup;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB550 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

3. “Harmful to minors” shall have the same meaning as such term
is defined in paragraph 2 of Section 1040.75 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
4. “Minor” means an individual under eighteen (18) years of
age; and
5. “Story hour” means an event hosted by a drag performer who
reads children’s books and engages in other learning activities with
minor children present.
B. 1. It shall be unlawful for a person to engage in an adult
cabaret performance which is harmful to minors or to organize or
authorize the viewing of an adult cabaret performance which is
harmful to minors on public property or in a location where the
adult cabaret performance could be viewed by a minor.
2. Any person who violates the provisions of this subsection
shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a felony punishable by
imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a
term not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years, or by
a fine not less than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) nor more than
Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00), or by both such imprisonment
and fine.
C. 1. It shall be unlawful for a person to organize or
authorize on public property a story hour for minors that is hosted
by a drag performer whose performance is harmful to minors.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB550 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. Any person who violates the provisions of this subsection
shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by
imprisonment in a county jail for a term not more than (1) year, or
by a fine not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than
One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or by both such imprisonment and
fine.
D. The provisions of this section shall preempt any ordinance,
regulation, or restriction that was lawfully adopted or license that
was issued by a political subdivision of this state prior to the
effective date of this act that is in conflict with the provisions
of this section.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON PUBLIC SAFETY
February 11, 2025 - DO PASS








SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB550 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)